District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

50-383.01

Establishment of taxi and limousine industry study task force.

Expired.

History

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 6042, 54 DCR 7052

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6042 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).

Short Title

Short title: Section 6041 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle E of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Taxi and Limousine Industry Study Task Force Act of 2007”.

Editor's Notes

Section 6046 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that this subchapter shall expire on October 1, 2008.